Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XVI.] SUBSTANCE ABUSE

Cross References

Mental health, alcohol, or drug abuse treatment reviews, see
chapter 334B.

Mental health and alcohol and drug abuse treatment insurance
benefits, see chapter 431M.

Mental health and substance abuse special fund, see §334-15.

Substance abuse testing, see chapter 329B.

§321-191 Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Advisory commission" means the state
advisory commission on drug abuse and controlled substances established in
section 329-2.

"Clean and sober home" means a
dwelling unit that is intended to provide a stable, independent environment of
alcohol- and drug-free living conditions to sustain recovery and that is shared
by unrelated adult persons who are recovering from substance abuse.

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Substance" means alcohol, any drug
on schedules I through IV of chapter 329, or any substance which includes in
its composition volatile organic solvents.

"Substance abuse" means the misuse of
a substance or the use of a substance to an extent deemed deleterious or
detrimental to the user, to others, or to society. [L 1975, c 190, pt of §2; am
L 2014, c 193, §4]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted.

Cross References

Diagnosis and counseling of minors, see §577-26.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next